test/src/morphology/N-val_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - вал: # Ordinary nouns 'word' - full paradigm including MWN
     вал+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: вал
     вал+N+Gen+Indef: валонь
     вал+N+Abl+Indef: валда
     вал+N+Dat+Indef: валонди
     вал+N+Abe+Indef: валфтома
     вал+N+Comp+Indef: валшка
     вал+N+Ine+Indef: валса
     вал+N+Ela+Indef: валста
     вал+N+Ill+Indef: валс
     вал+N+Prl+Indef: валга
     вал+N+Tra+Indef: валкс
     вал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: валозе
     вал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: валоне
     вал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: валозень
     вал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: валонень
     вал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [валзенди, валзти]
     вал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: валоненди
     вал+N+Abl+PxSg1: валдон
     вал+N+Abe+PxSg1: валфтомон
     вал+N+Comp+PxSg1: валшкан
     вал+N+Ine+PxSg1: валсон
     вал+N+Ela+PxSg1: валстон
     вал+N+Ill+PxSg1: валозон
     вал+N+Prl+PxSg1: валган
     вал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: валце
     вал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: валтне
     вал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: валцень
     вал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: валтнень
     вал+N+Abl+PxSg2: валдот
     вал+N+Abe+PxSg2: валфтомот
     вал+N+Comp+PxSg2: валшкат
     вал+N+Ine+PxSg2: валсот
     вал+N+Ela+PxSg2: валстот
     вал+N+Ill+PxSg2: валозт
     вал+N+Prl+PxSg2: валгат
     вал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: валоц
     вал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: валонза
     вал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: валонц
     вал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: валонзон
     вал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: валонцты
     вал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: валонзонды
     вал+N+Abl+PxSg3: валдонза
     вал+N+Abe+PxSg3: валфтомонза
     вал+N+Comp+PxSg3: валшканза
     вал+N+Ine+PxSg3: валсонза
     вал+N+Ela+PxSg3: валстонза
     вал+N+Ill+PxSg3: валозонза
     вал+N+Prl+PxSg3: валганза
     вал+N+Nom+PxPl1: валоньке
     вал+N+Gen+PxPl1: валоньконь
     вал+N+Dat+PxPl1: валоньконди
     вал+N+Abl+PxPl1: валдонк
     вал+N+Abe+PxPl1: валфтомонк
     вал+N+Comp+PxPl1: валшканк
     вал+N+Ine+PxPl1: валсонк
     вал+N+Ela+PxPl1: валстонк
     вал+N+Ill+PxPl1: валозонк
     вал+N+Prl+PxPl1: валганк
     вал+N+Nom+PxPl2: валонте
     вал+N+Gen+PxPl2: валонтень
     вал+N+Dat+PxPl2: валонтенди
     вал+N+Abl+PxPl2: валдонт
     вал+N+Abe+PxPl2: валфтомонт
     вал+N+Comp+PxPl2: валшкант
     вал+N+Ine+PxPl2: валсонт
     вал+N+Ela+PxPl2: валстонт
     вал+N+Ill+PxPl2: валозонт
     вал+N+Prl+PxPl2: валгант
     вал+N+Nom+PxPl3: валсна
     вал+N+Gen+PxPl3: валснон
     вал+N+Dat+PxPl3: валснонды
     вал+N+Abl+PxPl3: валдост
     вал+N+Abe+PxPl3: валфтомост
     вал+N+Comp+PxPl3: валшкаст
     вал+N+Ine+PxPl3: валсост
     вал+N+Ela+PxPl3: валстост
     вал+N+Ill+PxPl3: валозост
     вал+N+Prl+PxPl3: валгаст
     вал+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: валт
     вал+N+Sg+Nom+Def: валсь
     вал+N+Sg+Gen+Def: валть
     вал+N+Sg+Dat+Def: валти
     вал+N+Pl+Nom+Def: валтне
     вал+N+Pl+Gen+Def: валтнень
     вал+N+Pl+Dat+Def: валтненди    
     вал+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: валвок
     вал+N+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: валоньвок
     вал+N+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: валдовок
     вал+N+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: валондивок
     вал+N+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: валфтомовок
     вал+N+Comp+Indef+Foc/вок: валшкавок
     вал+N+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: валсовок
     вал+N+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: валстовок
     вал+N+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: валсвок
     вал+N+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: валгавок
     вал+N+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: валксвок
     вал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валозевок
     вал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валоневок
     вал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валозеньвок
     вал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валоненьвок
     вал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: [валозендивок, валозтивок]
     вал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валонендивок
     вал+N+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валдонвок
     вал+N+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валфтомонвок
     вал+N+Comp+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валшканвок
     вал+N+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валсонвок
     вал+N+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валстонвок
     вал+N+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валозонвок
     вал+N+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: валганвок
     вал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: валцевок
     вал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: валтневок
     вал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: валценьвок
     вал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: валтненьвок
     вал+N+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: валдотвок
     вал+N+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: валфтомотвок
     вал+N+Comp+PxSg2+Foc/вок: валшкатвок
     вал+N+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: валсотвок
     вал+N+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: валстотвок
     вал+N+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: валозтвок
     вал+N+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: валгатвок
     вал+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валоцвок
     вал+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валонзовок
     вал+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валонцвок
     вал+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валонзонвок
     вал+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валонцтывок
     вал+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валонзондывок
     вал+N+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валдонзовок
     вал+N+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валфтомонзовок
     вал+N+Comp+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валшканзовок
     вал+N+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валсонзовок
     вал+N+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валстонзовок
     вал+N+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валозонзовок
     вал+N+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: валганзовок
     вал+N+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: валонькевок
     вал+N+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: валоньконьвок
     вал+N+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: валонькондивок
     вал+N+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: валдонквок
     вал+N+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: валфтомонквок
     вал+N+Comp+PxPl1+Foc/вок: валшканквок
     вал+N+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: валсонквок
     вал+N+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: валстонквок
     вал+N+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: валозонквок
     вал+N+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: валганквок
     вал+N+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: валонтевок
     вал+N+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: валонтеньвок
     вал+N+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: валонтендивок
     вал+N+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: валдонтвок
     вал+N+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: валфтомонтвок
     вал+N+Comp+PxPl2+Foc/вок: валшкантвок
     вал+N+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: валсонтвок
     вал+N+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: валстонтвок
     вал+N+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: валозонтвок
     вал+N+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: валгантвок
     вал+N+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: валсновок
     вал+N+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: валснонвок
     вал+N+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: валснондывок
     вал+N+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: валдоствок
     вал+N+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: валфтомоствок
     вал+N+Comp+PxPl3+Foc/вок: валшкаствок
     вал+N+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: валсоствок
     вал+N+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: валстоствок
     вал+N+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: валозоствок
     вал+N+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: валгаствок
     вал+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: валтвок
     вал+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: валсьвок
     вал+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: валтьвок
     вал+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: валтивок
     вал+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: валтневок
     вал+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: валтненьвок
     вал+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: валтнендивок
